Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-721
Board of directors; quorum; how determined.

A majority of the board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business, unless a greater number is required by the articles of incorporation or the bylaws. The act of the majority of the directors present at a meeting at which a quorum is present shall be the act of the board, unless the act of a greater number is required by the articles of incorporation or the bylaws. For the purpose of determining a quorum, alternate directors shall be considered in the event of the absence, disability, disqualification, or death of any director.

Laws 1937, c. 50, § 21, p. 209;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 70-821;

R.S.1943, § 70-721;

Laws 1974, LB 833, § 3.